Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-104
Nature, purpose and duration of limited liability company; classification for tax purposes.

(RULLCA 104) (a) A limited liability company is an entity distinct from its members.

(b) A limited liability company may have any lawful purpose, except that a limited liability company may not operate as an insurer as defined in section 44-103.

(c) A limited liability company has perpetual duration.

(d) A limited liability company shall be classified for state income tax purposes in the same manner as it is classified for federal income tax purposes.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB758, § 1.